Illinois, session 104th, HB4836.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Sections 112A-14 and 112A-23 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/112A-14)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-14)7    Sec. 112A-14. Domestic violence order of protection; 8remedies. 9    (a) (Blank).10    (b) The court may order any of the remedies listed in this 11subsection (b). The remedies listed in this subsection (b) 12shall be in addition to other civil or criminal remedies 13available to petitioner.14        (1) Prohibition of abuse. Prohibit respondent's 15    harassment, interference with personal liberty, 16    intimidation of a dependent, physical abuse, or willful 17    deprivation, as defined in this Article, if such abuse has 18    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 19    prohibited.20        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 21    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 22    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 23    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner   HB4836- 2 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 2    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 3    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 4    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 5    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 6    Marriage Act.7            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 8        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 9        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 10        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 11        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 12        person or entity other than the opposing party that 13        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 14        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 15        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.16            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 17        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 18        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 19        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 20        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from 21        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 22        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 23        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 24        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 25        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 26        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to   HB4836- 3 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 2        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 3        the accessibility of the residence or household. 4        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 5        have a right to occupancy.6            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 7        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 8        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 9        that the hardships to respondent substantially 10        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 11        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 12        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 13        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 14        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 15        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 16        household.17        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 18    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 19    person protected by the domestic violence order of 20    protection, or prohibit respondent from entering or 21    remaining present at petitioner's school, place of 22    employment, or other specified places at times when 23    petitioner is present, or both, if reasonable, given the 24    balance of hardships. Hardships need not be balanced for 25    the court to enter a stay away order or prohibit entry if 26    respondent has no right to enter the premises.  HB4836- 4 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            (A) If a domestic violence order of protection 2        grants petitioner exclusive possession of the 3        residence, prohibits respondent from entering the 4        residence, or orders respondent to stay away from 5        petitioner or other protected persons, then the court 6        may allow respondent access to the residence to remove 7        items of clothing and personal adornment used 8        exclusively by respondent, medications, and other 9        items as the court directs. The right to access shall 10        be exercised on only one occasion as the court directs 11        and in the presence of an agreed-upon adult third 12        party or law enforcement officer.13            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 14        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 15        middle, or high school, the court when issuing a 16        domestic violence order of protection and providing 17        relief shall consider the severity of the act, any 18        continuing physical danger or emotional distress to 19        the petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to 20        the petitioner and respondent under federal and State 21        law, the availability of a transfer of the respondent 22        to another school, a change of placement or a change of 23        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 24        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 25        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 26        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order   HB4836- 5 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 2        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 3        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 4        change of placement or change of program, as 5        determined by the school district or private or 6        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 7        respondent's movements within the school attended by 8        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 9        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 10        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 11        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 12        bears the burden of production with respect to the 13        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 14        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 15        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 16        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 17        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 18        agree with the school district's or private or 19        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 20        change of program or solely on the ground that the 21        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 22        does not take an action required to effectuate a 23        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 24        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 25        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 26        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to   HB4836- 6 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        another attendance center within the respondent's 2        school district or private or non-public school, the 3        school district or private or non-public school shall 4        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 5        center to which the respondent is transferred. If the 6        court order results in a transfer of the minor 7        respondent to another attendance center, a change in 8        the respondent's placement, or a change of the 9        respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or legal 10        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 11        transportation and other costs associated with the 12        transfer or change.13            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 14        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 15        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 16        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. If 17        the court orders a transfer of the respondent to 18        another school, the parents, guardian, or legal 19        custodian of the respondent is responsible for 20        transportation and other costs associated with the 21        change of school by the respondent. 22        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 23    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 24    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 25    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 26    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor,   HB4836- 7 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 2    domestic violence abusers, or any other guidance service 3    the court deems appropriate. The court may order the 4    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 5    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 6    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 7    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 8        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 9    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 10    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 11    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 12    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 13    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 14    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 15    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 16    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 17    in loco parentis.18        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 19    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 20    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding physical care to 21    respondent would not be in the minor child's best 22    interest.23        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities 24    and significant decision-making responsibilities. Award 25    temporary significant decision-making responsibility to 26    petitioner in accordance with this Section, the Illinois   HB4836- 8 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, the Illinois 2    Parentage Act of 2015, and this State's Uniform 3    Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. 4        If the respondent is charged with abuse (as defined in 5    Section 112A-3 of this Code) of a minor child, there shall 6    be a rebuttable presumption that awarding temporary 7    significant decision-making responsibility to respondent 8    would not be in the child's best interest.9        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 10    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 11    physical care or temporary significant decision-making 12    responsibility of a minor child to petitioner. The court 13    shall restrict or deny respondent's parenting time with a 14    minor child if the court finds that respondent has done or 15    is likely to do any of the following:16            (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 17        parenting time;18            (ii) use the parenting time as an opportunity to 19        abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's family or 20        household members;21            (iii) improperly conceal or detain the minor 22        child; or23            (iv) otherwise act in a manner that is not in the 24        best interests of the minor child. 25        The court shall not be limited by the standards set 26    forth in Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and   HB4836- 9 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    Dissolution of Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting 2    time, the order shall specify dates and times for the 3    parenting time to take place or other specific parameters 4    or conditions that are appropriate. No order for parenting 5    time shall refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting 6    time". Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 7    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 8    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 9    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 10    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 11    in a violent or abusive manner. If necessary to protect 12    any member of petitioner's family or household from future 13    abuse, respondent shall be prohibited from coming to 14    petitioner's residence to meet the minor child for 15    parenting time, and the petitioner and respondent shall 16    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 17    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 18    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 19    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 20    acknowledging accountability to the court.21        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 22    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or 23    concealing the child within the State.24        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 25    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 26    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return   HB4836- 10 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner, or to 2    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 3    child or the respondent.4        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 5    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 6    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 7    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:8            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 9        property; or10            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 11        property jointly; sharing it would risk abuse of 12        petitioner by respondent or is impracticable; and the 13        balance of hardships favors temporary possession by 14        petitioner.15        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 16    property is that it is marital property, the court may 17    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 18    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 19    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 20    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 21    hereafter amended.22        No order under this provision shall affect title to 23    property.24        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 25    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 26    damaging, or otherwise disposing of any real or personal   HB4836- 11 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 2    if:3            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 4        property; or5            (ii) the petitioner and respondent own the 6        property jointly, and the balance of hardships favors 7        granting this remedy.8        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 9    property is that it is marital property, the court may 10    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 11    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 12    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 13    now or hereafter amended.14        The court may further prohibit respondent from 15    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 16    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 17    advantage of respondent or of any other person.18        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 19    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 20    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 21    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 22    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 23    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 24    animal and forbid the respondent from taking, 25    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 26    otherwise disposing of the animal.   HB4836- 12 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 2    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 3    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 4    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 5    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 6    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 7    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 8    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 9    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 10    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 11    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 12    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 13    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 14    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 15    responsibility differently and vacating petitioner's 16    significant decision-making responsibility unless 17    otherwise provided in the order.18        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 19    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 20    the abuse. Such losses shall include, but not be limited 21    to, medical expenses, lost earnings or other support, 22    repair or replacement of property damaged or taken, 23    reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and moving or 24    other travel expenses, including additional reasonable 25    expenses for temporary shelter and restaurant meals.26            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is   HB4836- 13 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        entitled to seek maintenance, child support, or 2        property distribution from the other party under the 3        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 4        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 5        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 6        the extent that such reimbursement would be 7        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by 8        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.9            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 10        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 11        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 12        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 13        and recovery of the minor child, including, but not 14        limited to, legal fees, court costs, private 15        investigator fees, and travel costs.16        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 17    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 18    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 19    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 20    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.21        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and 22    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearm 23    parts. 24            (A) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph 25        (B-2), if applicable, a person who is subject to an 26        existing domestic violence order of protection issued   HB4836- 14 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        under this Code may not lawfully possess firearms or 2        firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 3        operable firearm or a Firearm Owner's Identification 4        Card under Section 8.2 of the Firearm Owners 5        Identification Card Act.6            (B) Any firearms in the possession of the 7        respondent, except as provided in subparagraph (C) of 8        this paragraph (14.5) and subject to the provisions of 9        subparagraph (B-2), if applicable, shall be ordered by 10        the court to be surrendered to law enforcement for 11        safekeeping. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 12        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 13        be immediately surrendered to the serving officers at 14        the time of service of the order of protection, and any 15        other firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered 16        to local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 17        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 18        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the 19        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 20        subparagraph (C), shall also be ordered by the court 21        to be turned over to serving officers at the time of 22        service of the order of protection or, if not on the 23        respondent's person or at the location where the 24        respondent is served at the time of service, to local 25        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 26        order. The law enforcement agency shall immediately   HB4836- 15 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        mail the card, as well as any license, to the Illinois 2        State Police Firearm Owner's Identification Card 3        Office for safekeeping. 4            (B-1) Upon request of the petitioner or the 5        State's Attorney on behalf of the petitioner, a law 6        enforcement officer may seek a search warrant based on 7        the allegations in the petition for the Order of 8        Protection. 9                (i) If requested by law enforcement, the court 10            shall issue a search warrant for the seizure of 11            any firearms or firearm parts that could be 12            assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to 13            the respondent at or after entry of an order of 14            protection if the court, based upon sworn 15            testimony and governed by Sections 108-3 and 16            108-4, finds probable cause exists that: 17                    (aa) the respondent poses an immediate and 18                present credible threat to the physical safety 19                of the petitioner protected by the order of 20                protection; 21                    (bb) the respondent possesses firearms or 22                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 23                an operable firearm; and24                    (cc) the firearms or firearm parts that 25                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 26                are located at the residence, vehicle, or   HB4836- 16 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1                other property of the respondent to be 2                searched. 3                (ii) The search warrant shall specify with 4            particularity the scope of the search, including 5            the property to be searched, and shall direct the 6            law enforcement agency to seize the respondent's 7            firearms and firearm parts that could be assembled 8            to make an operable firearm. Law enforcement shall 9            also be directed to seize into their possession 10            any Firearm Owner's Identification Card and any 11            Concealed Carry License belonging to the 12            respondent. 13                (iii) The law enforcement agency to which the 14            court has directed the warrant shall execute the 15            warrant no later than 96 hours after issuance. The 16            law enforcement agency to which the court has 17            directed the warrant may coordinate with other law 18            enforcement agencies to execute the warrant. A 19            return of the warrant shall be filed by the law 20            enforcement agency within 24 hours of execution, 21            setting forth the time, date, and location where 22            the warrant was executed and what items, if any, 23            were seized. If the court is not in session, the 24            return information shall be returned on the next 25            date the court is in session. Subject to the 26            provisions of this Section, peace officers shall   HB4836- 17 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            have the same authority to execute a warrant 2            issued under this subsection as a warrant issued 3            under Article 108.4                (iv) If the property to be searched is in 5            another county, the petitioner or the State's 6            Attorney may seek a search warrant in that county 7            with the law enforcement agency with primary 8            responsibility for responding to service calls at 9            the property to be searched. Regardless of whether 10            the petitioner is working with the State's 11            Attorney under subsection (d) of Section 112A-4.5, 12            the petitioner may request the State's Attorney's 13            assistance to request that the law enforcement 14            agency in the county where the property is located 15            seek a search warrant.16                (v) Service of an order of protection shall, 17            to the extent possible, be concurrent with any 18            warrant issued under this paragraph.19            (B-2) Ex parte relief may be granted under this 20        paragraph (14.5) only if the court finds that personal 21        injury to the petitioner is likely to occur if the 22        respondent received prior notice and if the petitioner 23        has otherwise satisfied the requirements of Section 24        112A-17.5 of this Article. 25            (C) If the respondent is a peace officer as 26        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012,   HB4836- 18 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 2        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 3        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 4        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 5        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 6        for safekeeping for the duration of the domestic 7        violence order of protection.8            (D)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 9        assembled to make an operable firearm that have been 10        seized or surrendered shall be kept by the law 11        enforcement agency that took possession of the items 12        for safekeeping, except as provided in subparagraph 13        (C), (E), or (F). The period of safekeeping shall be 14        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 15        provided in subparagraph (F), the respondent is 16        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts 17        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 18        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 19        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 20        the court describing any seized or surrendered 21        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent 22        that the respondent may seek the return of the 23        respondent's items at the end of the order of 24        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter 25        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 26        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for   HB4836- 19 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 2        under this subsection.3            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to 4        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm 5        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 6        and to notify the Illinois State Police Firearm 7        Owner's Identification Card Office at the end of the 8        Order of Protection.9            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 10        respondent may request the return of any seized or 11        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 12        assembled to make an operable firearm. Seized or 13        surrendered firearms or firearm parts shall be 14        returned within 14 days of the request to the 15        respondent, if the respondent is lawfully eligible to 16        possess firearms, or to a designated third party who 17        is lawfully eligible to possess firearms. If the 18        firearms or firearm parts cannot be returned to 19        respondent because (1) the respondent has not 20        requested the return or transfer of the firearms or 21        firearm parts as set forth in this subparagraph and 22        (2) the respondent cannot be located or fails to 23        respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve the 24        firearms, upon petition from the appropriate law 25        enforcement agency and notice to the respondent at the 26        respondent's last known address, the court may order   HB4836- 20 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        the law enforcement agency to destroy the firearms or 2        firearm parts; use the firearms or firearm parts for 3        training purposes, or for any other application as 4        deemed appropriate by the law enforcement agency; or 5        turn over the firearms or firearm parts to a third 6        party who is lawfully eligible to possess firearms, 7        and who does not reside with respondent. 8            (E)(i) If a person other than the respondent 9        claims title to any firearms or firearm parts that 10        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 11        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 12        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 13        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 14        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to 15        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the 16        petition, the court determines the person to be the 17        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 18        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 19        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 20        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 21        person, provided that: 22                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 23            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 24            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or 25            possession, and the lawful owner agrees to store 26            the firearm and firearm parts that could be   HB4836- 21 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 2            such that the respondent does not have access to 3            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that 4            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 5            and 6                (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 7            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 8            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 9            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 10        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 11        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 12        affirm by affidavit that he or she:13                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 14            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 15            operable firearm;16                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 17            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 18            operable firearm to the respondent; and19                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 20            that could be assembled to make an operable 21            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not 22            have access to or control of the firearm and 23            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 24            operable firearm. 25            (F)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 26        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or   HB4836- 22 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 2        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the 3        petitioner and the third party must appear at the 4        hearing. 5            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 6        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:7                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by 8            affidavit and to the open court that: 9                    (I) the third party transferee does not 10                reside with the respondent; 11                    (II) the respondent does not have access 12                to the location in which the third party 13                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 14                firearm parts; 15                    (III) the third party transferee will not 16                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 17                respondent or anyone who resides with the 18                respondent; 19                    (IV) the third party transferee will 20                maintain control and possession of the firearm 21                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by 22                the court; and 23                    (V) the third party transferee will be 24                subject to criminal penalties for transferring 25                the firearms or firearm parts to the 26                respondent; and   HB4836- 23 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1                (bb) the court finds that: 2                    (I) the third party respondent holds a 3                valid Firearm Owner's Identification; and4                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 5                parts to the third party transferee does not 6                place the petitioner or any other protected 7                parties at any additional threat or risk of 8                harm. 9        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If a domestic 10    violence order of protection prohibits respondent from 11    having contact with the minor child, or if petitioner's 12    address is omitted under subsection (b) of Section 112A-5 13    of this Code, or if necessary to prevent abuse or wrongful 14    removal or concealment of a minor child, the order shall 15    deny respondent access to, and prohibit respondent from 16    inspecting, obtaining, or attempting to inspect or obtain, 17    school or any other records of the minor child who is in 18    the care of petitioner.19        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 20    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 21    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 22    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 23    deemed reasonable by the court.24        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive 25    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 26    of a family or household member or to effectuate one of the   HB4836- 24 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    granted remedies, if supported by the balance of 2    hardships. If the harm to be prevented by the injunction 3    is abuse or any other harm that one of the remedies listed 4    in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this subsection is 5    designed to prevent, no further evidence is necessary to 6    establish that the harm is an irreparable injury.7        (18) Telephone services.8            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 9        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 10        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 11        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 12        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 13        indicated by the petitioner and the financial 14        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 15        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. In 16        this paragraph (18), the term "wireless telephone 17        service provider" means a provider of commercial 18        mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 332. The 19        petitioner may request the transfer of each telephone 20        number that the petitioner, or a minor child in his or 21        her custody, uses. The clerk of the court shall serve 22        the order on the wireless telephone service provider's 23        agent for service of process provided to the Illinois 24        Commerce Commission. The order shall contain all of 25        the following: 26                (i) The name and billing telephone number of   HB4836- 25 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            the account holder including the name of the 2            wireless telephone service provider that serves 3            the account.4                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 5            transferred.6                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 7            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 8            and right to the use of any telephone number 9            transferred under this paragraph.10            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 11        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 12        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 13        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this 14        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 15        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 16        following applies:17                (i) The account holder named in the order has 18            terminated the account.19                (ii) A difference in network technology would 20            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 21            a network if the transfer occurs.22                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 23            other limitation on network or service provision 24            to the petitioner.25                (iv) Another technological or operational 26            issue would prevent or impair the use of the   HB4836- 26 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            telephone number if the transfer occurs.2            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 3        responsibility for and right to the use of any 4        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 5        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 6        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 7        mobile device associated with the number.8            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 9        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 10        requirements for establishing an account or 11        transferring a number, including requiring the 12        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 13        financial information, and customer preferences.14            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 15        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 16        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 17        with a court order issued under this paragraph.18            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 19        services to residential customers shall provide to the 20        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 21        an agent for service of orders entered under this 22        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 23        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 24        Commission within 30 days of such change. 25            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 26        maintain the list of registered agents for service for   HB4836- 27 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        each wireless telephone service provider on the 2        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 3        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 4        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 5        is provided and displayed. 6    (c) Relevant factors; findings.7        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 8    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 9    relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the 10    following:11            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern, and 12        consequences of the respondent's past abuse of the 13        petitioner or any family or household member, 14        including the concealment of his or her location in 15        order to evade service of process or notice, and the 16        likelihood of danger of future abuse to petitioner or 17        any member of petitioner's or respondent's family or 18        household; and19            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 20        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 21        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State, 22        or improperly separated from the child's primary 23        caretaker.24        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 25    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 26    court shall consider relevant factors, including, but not   HB4836- 28 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    limited to, the following:2            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 3        adequacy, location, and other characteristics of 4        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 5        or dependent adult in the party's care;6            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and7            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 8        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 9        care, to family, school, church, and community.10        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 11    (4) of this subsection (c), the court shall make its 12    findings in an official record or in writing, and shall at 13    a minimum set forth the following:14            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 15        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 16        of this subsection (c).17            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 18        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 19        or continued abuse.20            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 21        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 22        other alleged abused persons.23        (4) (Blank).24        (5) Never married parties. No rights or 25    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 26    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and   HB4836- 29 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 2    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 3    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 4    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 5    Act of 1975, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 6    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 7    administrative, or other act of another state or 8    territory, any other statute of this State, or by any 9    foreign nation establishing the father and child 10    relationship, any other proceeding substantially in 11    conformity with the federal Personal Responsibility and 12    Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, or when both 13    parties appeared in open court or at an administrative 14    hearing acknowledging under oath or admitting by 15    affirmation the existence of a father and child 16    relationship. Absent such an adjudication, no putative 17    father shall be granted temporary allocation of parental 18    responsibilities, including parenting time with the minor 19    child, or physical care and possession of the minor child, 20    nor shall an order of payment for support of the minor 21    child be entered.22    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 23that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of 24a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 25subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 26balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall   HB4836- 30 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 2result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 3outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 4The findings shall be an official record or in writing.5    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 6based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:7        (1) respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 8    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 9    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;10        (2) respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;11        (3) petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 12    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 13    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 14    of 2012; 15        (4) petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 16    of another;17        (5) petitioner left the residence or household to 18    avoid further abuse by respondent;19        (6) petitioner did not leave the residence or 20    household to avoid further abuse by respondent; or 21        (7) conduct by any family or household member excused 22    the abuse by respondent, unless that same conduct would 23    have excused such abuse if the parties had not been family 24    or household members.25(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.)   HB4836- 31 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    (725 ILCS 5/112A-23)  (from Ch. 38, par. 112A-23)2    Sec. 112A-23. Enforcement of protective orders. 3    (a) When violation is crime. A violation of any protective 4order, whether issued in a civil, quasi-criminal proceeding or 5by a military judge, shall be enforced by a criminal court 6when:7        (1) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 8    domestic violence order of protection pursuant to Section 9    12-3.4 or 12-30 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 10    Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly violated:11            (i) remedies described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), 12        (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 112A-14 13        of this Code,14            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 15        the remedies authorized under paragraph (1), (2), (3), 16        (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the 17        Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid 18        order of protection, which is authorized under the 19        laws of another state, tribe, or United States 20        territory, or21            (iii) any other remedy when the act constitutes a 22        crime against the protected parties as defined by the 23        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.24        Prosecution for a violation of a domestic violence 25    order of protection shall not bar concurrent prosecution   HB4836- 32 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    for any other crime, including any crime that may have 2    been committed at the time of the violation of the 3    domestic violence order of protection; or4        (1.5) A person commits the crime of violation of an 5    order of protection under Section 12-3.4 or 12-30 of the 6    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 if the 7    person, in violation of an order under subparagraph (E) or 8    (F) of paragraph (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 9    112A-14 of this Code, knowingly transfers a firearm or 10    firearm parts to the respondent or otherwise allows the 11    respondent access to a firearm or firearm parts. 12        (2) The respondent commits the crime of child 13    abduction pursuant to Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 14    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly 15    violated:16            (i) remedies described in paragraph (5), (6), or 17        (8) of subsection (b) of Section 112A-14 of this Code, 18        or19            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 20        the remedies authorized under paragraph (1), (5), (6), 21        or (8) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of the Illinois 22        Domestic Violence Act of 1986, in a valid domestic 23        violence order of protection, which is authorized 24        under the laws of another state, tribe, or United 25        States territory.26        (3) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a   HB4836- 33 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    civil no contact order when the respondent violates 2    Section 12-3.8 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Prosecution 3    for a violation of a civil no contact order shall not bar 4    concurrent prosecution for any other crime, including any 5    crime that may have been committed at the time of the 6    violation of the civil no contact order.7        (4) The respondent commits the crime of violation of a 8    stalking no contact order when the respondent violates 9    Section 12-3.9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Prosecution 10    for a violation of a stalking no contact order shall not 11    bar concurrent prosecution for any other crime, including 12    any crime that may have been committed at the time of the 13    violation of the stalking no contact order. 14    (b) When violation is contempt of court. A violation of 15any valid protective order, whether issued in a civil or 16criminal proceeding or by a military judge, may be enforced 17through civil or criminal contempt procedures, as appropriate, 18by any court with jurisdiction, regardless where the act or 19acts which violated the protective order were committed, to 20the extent consistent with the venue provisions of this 21Article. Nothing in this Article shall preclude any Illinois 22court from enforcing any valid protective order issued in 23another state. Illinois courts may enforce protective orders 24through both criminal prosecution and contempt proceedings, 25unless the action which is second in time is barred by 26collateral estoppel or the constitutional prohibition against   HB4836- 34 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1double jeopardy.2        (1) In a contempt proceeding where the petition for a 3    rule to show cause sets forth facts evidencing an 4    immediate danger that the respondent will flee the 5    jurisdiction, conceal a child, or inflict physical abuse 6    on the petitioner or minor children or on dependent adults 7    in petitioner's care, the court may order the attachment 8    of the respondent without prior service of the rule to 9    show cause or the petition for a rule to show cause. Bond 10    shall be set unless specifically denied in writing.11        (2) A petition for a rule to show cause for violation 12    of a protective order shall be treated as an expedited 13    proceeding.14    (c) Violation of custody, allocation of parental 15responsibility, or support orders. A violation of remedies 16described in paragraph (5), (6), (8), or (9) of subsection (b) 17of Section 112A-14 of this Code may be enforced by any remedy 18provided by Section 607.5 of the Illinois Marriage and 19Dissolution of Marriage Act. The court may enforce any order 20for support issued under paragraph (12) of subsection (b) of 21Section 112A-14 of this Code in the manner provided for under 22Parts V and VII of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 23Marriage Act.24    (d) Actual knowledge. A protective order may be enforced 25pursuant to this Section if the respondent violates the order 26after the respondent has actual knowledge of its contents as   HB4836- 35 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1shown through one of the following means:2        (1) (Blank).3        (2) (Blank).4        (3) By service of a protective order under subsection 5    (f) of Section 112A-17.5 or Section 112A-22 of this Code.6        (4) By other means demonstrating actual knowledge of 7    the contents of the order.8    (e) The enforcement of a protective order in civil or 9criminal court shall not be affected by either of the 10following:11        (1) The existence of a separate, correlative order 12    entered under Section 112A-15 of this Code.13        (2) Any finding or order entered in a conjoined 14    criminal proceeding.15    (e-5) If a civil no contact order entered under subsection 16(6) of Section 112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 171963 conflicts with an order issued pursuant to the Juvenile 18Court Act of 1987 or the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 19Marriage Act, the conflicting order issued under subsection 20(6) of Section 112A-20 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 211963 shall be void.22    (f) Circumstances. The court, when determining whether or 23not a violation of a protective order has occurred, shall not 24require physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the 25victim.26    (g) Penalties.  HB4836- 36 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 2    subsection (g), where the court finds the commission of a 3    crime or contempt of court under subsection (a) or (b) of 4    this Section, the penalty shall be the penalty that 5    generally applies in such criminal or contempt 6    proceedings, and may include one or more of the following: 7    incarceration, payment of restitution, a fine, payment of 8    attorneys' fees and costs, or community service.9        (2) The court shall hear and take into account 10    evidence of any factors in aggravation or mitigation 11    before deciding an appropriate penalty under paragraph (1) 12    of this subsection (g).13        (3) To the extent permitted by law, the court is 14    encouraged to:15            (i) increase the penalty for the knowing violation 16        of any protective order over any penalty previously 17        imposed by any court for respondent's violation of any 18        protective order or penal statute involving petitioner 19        as victim and respondent as defendant;20            (ii) impose a minimum penalty of 24 hours 21        imprisonment for respondent's first violation of any 22        protective order; and23            (iii) impose a minimum penalty of 48 hours 24        imprisonment for respondent's second or subsequent 25        violation of a protective order26    unless the court explicitly finds that an increased   HB4836- 37 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    penalty or that period of imprisonment would be manifestly 2    unjust.3        (4) In addition to any other penalties imposed for a 4    violation of a protective order, a criminal court may 5    consider evidence of any violations of a protective order:6            (i) to modify the conditions of pretrial release 7        on an underlying criminal charge pursuant to Section 8        110-6 of this Code;9            (ii) to revoke or modify an order of probation, 10        conditional discharge, or supervision, pursuant to 11        Section 5-6-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;12            (iii) to revoke or modify a sentence of periodic 13        imprisonment, pursuant to Section 5-7-2 of the Unified 14        Code of Corrections.15(Source: P.A. 102-184, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 103-407, eff. 177-28-23.) 18    Section 10. The Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 is 19amended by changing Sections 214 and 223 as follows: 20    (750 ILCS 60/214)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-14)21    Sec. 214. Order of protection; remedies. 22    (a) Issuance of order. If the court finds that petitioner 23has been abused by a family or household member or that 24petitioner is a high-risk adult who has been abused,   HB4836- 38 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1neglected, or exploited, as defined in this Act, an order of 2protection prohibiting the abuse, neglect, or exploitation 3shall issue; provided that petitioner must also satisfy the 4requirements of one of the following Sections, as appropriate: 5Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on interim 6orders, or Section 219 on plenary orders. Petitioner shall not 7be denied an order of protection because petitioner or 8respondent is a minor. The court, when determining whether or 9not to issue an order of protection, shall not require 10physical manifestations of abuse on the person of the victim. 11Modification and extension of prior orders of protection shall 12be in accordance with this Act.13    (b) Remedies and standards. The remedies to be included in 14an order of protection shall be determined in accordance with 15this Section and one of the following Sections, as 16appropriate: Section 217 on emergency orders, Section 218 on 17interim orders, and Section 219 on plenary orders. The 18remedies listed in this subsection shall be in addition to 19other civil or criminal remedies available to petitioner.20        (1) Prohibition of abuse, neglect, or exploitation. 21    Prohibit respondent's harassment, interference with 22    personal liberty, intimidation of a dependent, physical 23    abuse, or willful deprivation, neglect or exploitation, as 24    defined in this Act, or stalking of the petitioner, as 25    defined in Section 12-7.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, if 26    such abuse, neglect, exploitation, or stalking has   HB4836- 39 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    occurred or otherwise appears likely to occur if not 2    prohibited.3        (2) Grant of exclusive possession of residence. 4    Prohibit respondent from entering or remaining in any 5    residence, household, or premises of the petitioner, 6    including one owned or leased by respondent, if petitioner 7    has a right to occupancy thereof. The grant of exclusive 8    possession of the residence, household, or premises shall 9    not affect title to real property, nor shall the court be 10    limited by the standard set forth in subsection (c-2) of 11    Section 501 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 12    Marriage Act.13            (A) Right to occupancy. A party has a right to 14        occupancy of a residence or household if it is solely 15        or jointly owned or leased by that party, that party's 16        spouse, a person with a legal duty to support that 17        party or a minor child in that party's care, or by any 18        person or entity other than the opposing party that 19        authorizes that party's occupancy (e.g., a domestic 20        violence shelter). Standards set forth in subparagraph 21        (B) shall not preclude equitable relief.22            (B) Presumption of hardships. If petitioner and 23        respondent each has the right to occupancy of a 24        residence or household, the court shall balance (i) 25        the hardships to respondent and any minor child or 26        dependent adult in respondent's care resulting from   HB4836- 40 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        entry of this remedy with (ii) the hardships to 2        petitioner and any minor child or dependent adult in 3        petitioner's care resulting from continued exposure to 4        the risk of abuse (should petitioner remain at the 5        residence or household) or from loss of possession of 6        the residence or household (should petitioner leave to 7        avoid the risk of abuse). When determining the balance 8        of hardships, the court shall also take into account 9        the accessibility of the residence or household. 10        Hardships need not be balanced if respondent does not 11        have a right to occupancy.12            The balance of hardships is presumed to favor 13        possession by petitioner unless the presumption is 14        rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence, showing 15        that the hardships to respondent substantially 16        outweigh the hardships to petitioner and any minor 17        child or dependent adult in petitioner's care. The 18        court, on the request of petitioner or on its own 19        motion, may order respondent to provide suitable, 20        accessible, alternate housing for petitioner instead 21        of excluding respondent from a mutual residence or 22        household.23        (3) Stay away order and additional prohibitions. Order 24    respondent to stay away from petitioner or any other 25    person protected by the order of protection, or prohibit 26    respondent from entering or remaining present at   HB4836- 41 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    petitioner's school, place of employment, or other 2    specified places at times when petitioner is present, or 3    both, if reasonable, given the balance of hardships. 4    Hardships need not be balanced for the court to enter a 5    stay away order or prohibit entry if respondent has no 6    right to enter the premises.7            (A) If an order of protection grants petitioner 8        exclusive possession of the residence, or prohibits 9        respondent from entering the residence, or orders 10        respondent to stay away from petitioner or other 11        protected persons, then the court may allow respondent 12        access to the residence to remove items of clothing 13        and personal adornment used exclusively by respondent, 14        medications, and other items as the court directs. The 15        right to access shall be exercised on only one 16        occasion as the court directs and in the presence of an 17        agreed-upon adult third party or law enforcement 18        officer.19            (B) When the petitioner and the respondent attend 20        the same public, private, or non-public elementary, 21        middle, or high school, the court when issuing an 22        order of protection and providing relief shall 23        consider the severity of the act, any continuing 24        physical danger or emotional distress to the 25        petitioner, the educational rights guaranteed to the 26        petitioner and respondent under federal and State law,   HB4836- 42 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        the availability of a transfer of the respondent to 2        another school, a change of placement or a change of 3        program of the respondent, the expense, difficulty, 4        and educational disruption that would be caused by a 5        transfer of the respondent to another school, and any 6        other relevant facts of the case. The court may order 7        that the respondent not attend the public, private, or 8        non-public elementary, middle, or high school attended 9        by the petitioner, order that the respondent accept a 10        change of placement or change of program, as 11        determined by the school district or private or 12        non-public school, or place restrictions on the 13        respondent's movements within the school attended by 14        the petitioner. The respondent bears the burden of 15        proving by a preponderance of the evidence that a 16        transfer, change of placement, or change of program of 17        the respondent is not available. The respondent also 18        bears the burden of production with respect to the 19        expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that 20        would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to 21        another school. A transfer, change of placement, or 22        change of program is not unavailable to the respondent 23        solely on the ground that the respondent does not 24        agree with the school district's or private or 25        non-public school's transfer, change of placement, or 26        change of program or solely on the ground that the   HB4836- 43 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        respondent fails or refuses to consent or otherwise 2        does not take an action required to effectuate a 3        transfer, change of placement, or change of program. 4        When a court orders a respondent to stay away from the 5        public, private, or non-public school attended by the 6        petitioner and the respondent requests a transfer to 7        another attendance center within the respondent's 8        school district or private or non-public school, the 9        school district or private or non-public school shall 10        have sole discretion to determine the attendance 11        center to which the respondent is transferred. In the 12        event the court order results in a transfer of the 13        minor respondent to another attendance center, a 14        change in the respondent's placement, or a change of 15        the respondent's program, the parents, guardian, or 16        legal custodian of the respondent is responsible for 17        transportation and other costs associated with the 18        transfer or change. 19            (C) The court may order the parents, guardian, or 20        legal custodian of a minor respondent to take certain 21        actions or to refrain from taking certain actions to 22        ensure that the respondent complies with the order. In 23        the event the court orders a transfer of the 24        respondent to another school, the parents, guardian, 25        or legal custodian of the respondent is responsible 26        for transportation and other costs associated with the   HB4836- 44 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        change of school by the respondent. 2        (4) Counseling. Require or recommend the respondent to 3    undergo counseling for a specified duration with a social 4    worker, psychologist, clinical psychologist, 5    psychiatrist, family service agency, alcohol or substance 6    abuse program, mental health center guidance counselor, 7    agency providing services to elders, program designed for 8    domestic violence abusers or any other guidance service 9    the court deems appropriate. The Court may order the 10    respondent in any intimate partner relationship to report 11    to an Illinois Department of Human Services protocol 12    approved partner abuse intervention program for an 13    assessment and to follow all recommended treatment. 14        (5) Physical care and possession of the minor child. 15    In order to protect the minor child from abuse, neglect, 16    or unwarranted separation from the person who has been the 17    minor child's primary caretaker, or to otherwise protect 18    the well-being of the minor child, the court may do either 19    or both of the following: (i) grant petitioner physical 20    care or possession of the minor child, or both, or (ii) 21    order respondent to return a minor child to, or not remove 22    a minor child from, the physical care of a parent or person 23    in loco parentis.24        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 25    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 26    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that   HB4836- 45 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    awarding physical care to respondent would not be in the 2    minor child's best interest.3        (6) Temporary allocation of parental responsibilities: 4    significant decision-making. Award temporary 5    decision-making responsibility to petitioner in accordance 6    with this Section, the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution 7    of Marriage Act, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, and 8    this State's Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and 9    Enforcement Act. 10        If a court finds, after a hearing, that respondent has 11    committed abuse (as defined in Section 103) of a minor 12    child, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that 13    awarding temporary significant decision-making 14    responsibility to respondent would not be in the child's 15    best interest.16        (7) Parenting time. Determine the parenting time, if 17    any, of respondent in any case in which the court awards 18    physical care or allocates temporary significant 19    decision-making responsibility of a minor child to 20    petitioner. The court shall restrict or deny respondent's 21    parenting time with a minor child if the court finds that 22    respondent has done or is likely to do any of the 23    following: (i) abuse or endanger the minor child during 24    parenting time; (ii) use the parenting time as an 25    opportunity to abuse or harass petitioner or petitioner's 26    family or household members; (iii) improperly conceal or   HB4836- 46 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    detain the minor child; or (iv) otherwise act in a manner 2    that is not in the best interests of the minor child. The 3    court shall not be limited by the standards set forth in 4    Section 603.10 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5    Marriage Act. If the court grants parenting time, the 6    order shall specify dates and times for the parenting time 7    to take place or other specific parameters or conditions 8    that are appropriate. No order for parenting time shall 9    refer merely to the term "reasonable parenting time".10        Petitioner may deny respondent access to the minor 11    child if, when respondent arrives for parenting time, 12    respondent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol and 13    constitutes a threat to the safety and well-being of 14    petitioner or petitioner's minor children or is behaving 15    in a violent or abusive manner.16        If necessary to protect any member of petitioner's 17    family or household from future abuse, respondent shall be 18    prohibited from coming to petitioner's residence to meet 19    the minor child for parenting time, and the parties shall 20    submit to the court their recommendations for reasonable 21    alternative arrangements for parenting time. A person may 22    be approved to supervise parenting time only after filing 23    an affidavit accepting that responsibility and 24    acknowledging accountability to the court.25        (8) Removal or concealment of minor child. Prohibit 26    respondent from removing a minor child from the State or   HB4836- 47 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    concealing the child within the State.2        (9) Order to appear. Order the respondent to appear in 3    court, alone or with a minor child, to prevent abuse, 4    neglect, removal or concealment of the child, to return 5    the child to the custody or care of the petitioner or to 6    permit any court-ordered interview or examination of the 7    child or the respondent.8        (10) Possession of personal property. Grant petitioner 9    exclusive possession of personal property and, if 10    respondent has possession or control, direct respondent to 11    promptly make it available to petitioner, if:12            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 13        property; or14            (ii) the parties own the property jointly; sharing 15        it would risk abuse of petitioner by respondent or is 16        impracticable; and the balance of hardships favors 17        temporary possession by petitioner.18        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 19    property is that it is marital property, the court may 20    award petitioner temporary possession thereof under the 21    standards of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph only if a 22    proper proceeding has been filed under the Illinois 23    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as now or 24    hereafter amended.25        No order under this provision shall affect title to 26    property.  HB4836- 48 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        (11) Protection of property. Forbid the respondent 2    from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 3    damaging or otherwise disposing of any real or personal 4    property, except as explicitly authorized by the court, 5    if:6            (i) petitioner, but not respondent, owns the 7        property; or8            (ii) the parties own the property jointly, and the 9        balance of hardships favors granting this remedy.10        If petitioner's sole claim to ownership of the 11    property is that it is marital property, the court may 12    grant petitioner relief under subparagraph (ii) of this 13    paragraph only if a proper proceeding has been filed under 14    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 15    now or hereafter amended.16        The court may further prohibit respondent from 17    improperly using the financial or other resources of an 18    aged member of the family or household for the profit or 19    advantage of respondent or of any other person.20        (11.5) Protection of animals. Grant the petitioner the 21    exclusive care, custody, or control of any animal owned, 22    possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner 23    or the respondent or a minor child residing in the 24    residence or household of either the petitioner or the 25    respondent and order the respondent to stay away from the 26    animal and forbid the respondent from taking,   HB4836- 49 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 2    otherwise disposing of the animal. 3        (12) Order for payment of support. Order respondent to 4    pay temporary support for the petitioner or any child in 5    the petitioner's care or over whom the petitioner has been 6    allocated parental responsibility, when the respondent has 7    a legal obligation to support that person, in accordance 8    with the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage 9    Act, which shall govern, among other matters, the amount 10    of support, payment through the clerk and withholding of 11    income to secure payment. An order for child support may 12    be granted to a petitioner with lawful physical care of a 13    child, or an order or agreement for physical care of a 14    child, prior to entry of an order allocating significant 15    decision-making responsibility. Such a support order shall 16    expire upon entry of a valid order allocating parental 17    responsibility differently and vacating the petitioner's 18    significant decision-making authority, unless otherwise 19    provided in the order.20        (13) Order for payment of losses. Order respondent to 21    pay petitioner for losses suffered as a direct result of 22    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Such losses shall 23    include, but not be limited to, medical expenses, lost 24    earnings or other support, repair or replacement of 25    property damaged or taken, reasonable attorney's fees, 26    court costs and moving or other travel expenses, including   HB4836- 50 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    additional reasonable expenses for temporary shelter and 2    restaurant meals.3            (i) Losses affecting family needs. If a party is 4        entitled to seek maintenance, child support or 5        property distribution from the other party under the 6        Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act, as 7        now or hereafter amended, the court may order 8        respondent to reimburse petitioner's actual losses, to 9        the extent that such reimbursement would be 10        "appropriate temporary relief", as authorized by 11        subsection (a)(3) of Section 501 of that Act.12            (ii) Recovery of expenses. In the case of an 13        improper concealment or removal of a minor child, the 14        court may order respondent to pay the reasonable 15        expenses incurred or to be incurred in the search for 16        and recovery of the minor child, including but not 17        limited to legal fees, court costs, private 18        investigator fees, and travel costs.19        (14) Prohibition of entry. Prohibit the respondent 20    from entering or remaining in the residence or household 21    while the respondent is under the influence of alcohol or 22    drugs and constitutes a threat to the safety and 23    well-being of the petitioner or the petitioner's children.24        (14.5) Prohibition of possession of firearms and 25    firearm parts; search and seizure of firearms and firearms 26    parts.  HB4836- 51 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            (A)(i) Prohibit a respondent against whom an 2        emergency, interim, or plenary order of protection was 3        issued from possessing, during the duration of the 4        order, any firearms or firearm parts that could be 5        assembled into an operable firearm if a search warrant 6        is issued under (A-1) or the order:7                (aa) was issued after a hearing of which such 8            person received actual notice, and at which such 9            person had an opportunity to participate, or the 10            petitioner has satisfied the requirements of 11            Section 217;12                (bb) restrains such person from using physical 13            force; harassing, stalking, or threatening an 14            intimate partner of such person or child of such 15            intimate partner or person; or engaging in other 16            conduct that would place a petitioner an intimate 17            partner in reasonable fear of bodily injury to the 18            partner or child; and19                (cc) includes a finding that such person 20            represents a credible threat to the physical 21            safety of a petitioner such intimate partner or 22            child.23            (ii) The court shall order any respondent 24        prohibited from possessing firearms under item (i) of 25        subparagraph (A) to surrender any firearms or firearm 26        parts that could be assembled to make an operable   HB4836- 52 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        firearm. Any firearms or firearm parts on the 2        respondent's person or at the place of service shall 3        be surrendered to the serving officers at the time of 4        service of the order of protection, and any other 5        firearms or firearm parts shall be surrendered to 6        local law enforcement within 24 hours of service of 7        the order of protection. Any Firearm Owner's 8        Identification Card or Concealed Carry License in the 9        possession of the respondent, except as provided in 10        subparagraph (B), shall also be ordered by the court 11        to be turned over to the officer serving the order of 12        protection at the time of service or, if not on the 13        respondent's person or at the location where the 14        respondent is served at the time of service, to local 15        law enforcement within 24 hours of service of the 16        order of protection. The law enforcement agency shall 17        immediately mail the card, as well as any license, to 18        the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 19        Identification Card Office for safekeeping. 20            (A-1)(i) Upon issuance of an emergency, interim, 21        or plenary order of protection and subject to the 22        provisions of item (ii) of this subparagraph (A-1), 23        the court shall issue a search warrant for the seizure 24        of any firearms or firearm parts that could be 25        assembled to make an operable firearm belonging to the 26        respondent if the court, based upon sworn testimony,   HB4836- 53 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        finds that: 2                (aa) the respondent poses a credible threat to 3            the physical safety of the petitioner protected by 4            the order of protection; and 5                (bb) probable cause exists to believe that:6                    (I) the respondent possesses firearms or 7                firearm parts that could be assembled to make 8                an operable firearm;9                    (II) the firearms or firearm parts that 10                could be assembled to make an operable firearm 11                are located at the residence, vehicle, or 12                other property of the respondent to be 13                searched; and14                    (III) the credible threat to the physical 15                safety of the petitioner protected by the 16                order of protection is immediate and present. 17            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 18        determining whether the search warrant shall be 19        issued. 20            (ii) If the petitioner does not seek a warrant 21        under this subparagraph (A-1) or the court determines 22        that the requirements of this subparagraph (A-1) have 23        not been met, relief under subparagraph (A) alone may 24        be granted. 25            (iii) An ex parte search warrant shall be granted 26        under this subparagraph (A-1) only if the court finds   HB4836- 54 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        that:2                (aa) the elements of item (i) of subparagraph 3            (A-1) have been met;4                (bb) personal injury to the petitioner is 5            likely to occur if the respondent received prior 6            notice; and7                (cc) the petitioner has otherwise satisfied 8            the requirements of Section 217 of this Act. 9            (iv) Oral testimony is sufficient in lieu of an 10        affidavit to support a finding of probable cause. 11            (v) A search warrant issued under this 12        subparagraph (A-1) shall be directed by the court for 13        enforcement to the law enforcement agency with primary 14        responsibility for responding to calls for service at 15        the location to be searched or to another appropriate 16        law enforcement agency if justified by the 17        circumstances. The search warrant shall specify with 18        particularity the scope of the search, including the 19        property to be searched, and shall direct the law 20        enforcement agency to seize the respondent's firearms 21        and firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 22        operable firearm. Law enforcement shall also be 23        directed to seize any Firearm Owner's Identification 24        Card and any Concealed Carry License belonging to the 25        respondent.26             (vi) The petitioner shall prepare an information   HB4836- 55 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        sheet, reviewed by the court, for law enforcement at 2        the time the warrant is granted. The information sheet 3        shall include:4                (aa) contact information for the petitioner, 5            the petitioner's attorney, or both, including a 6            telephone number and email, if available;7                (bb) a physical description of the respondent, 8            including the respondent's date of birth, if 9            known, or approximate age, height, weight, race, 10            and hair color;11                (cc) days and times that the respondent is 12            likely to be at the property to be searched, if 13            known; and14                (dd) whether people other than the respondent 15            are likely to be present at the property to be 16            searched and when, if known. 17            (vii) The information sheet shall be transmitted 18        to the law enforcement agency to which the search 19        warrant is directed in the same manner as the warrant 20        is transmitted under Section 222 of this Act. 21            (viii) If the court, after determining a search 22        warrant should issue, finds that the petitioner has 23        made a credible report of domestic violence to the 24        local law enforcement agency within the previous 90 25        days, law enforcement shall execute the warrant no 26        later than 96 hours after receipt of the warrant. If   HB4836- 56 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        the court finds that petitioner has not made such a 2        report, the law enforcement agency to which the court 3        has directed the warrant shall, within 48 hours of 4        receipt, evaluate the warrant and seek any corrections 5        to the warrant, and, if applicable, add to or negate 6        the warrant. If the law enforcement agency seeks to 7        correct or negate the warrant, it shall take 8        reasonable steps to notify the petitioner before 9        appearing before the court. The record shall reflect 10        the court's findings in determining whether to 11        correct, add, or negate the warrant. If a change is 12        made regarding the search warrant, law enforcement 13        shall execute the warrant no later than 96 hours after 14        the correction is issued. The law enforcement agency 15        shall notify the petitioner of any changes to the 16        warrant or if the warrant has been negated. The law 17        enforcement agency to which the court has directed the 18        warrant may coordinate with other law enforcement 19        agencies to execute the warrant. A return of the 20        warrant shall be filed by the law enforcement agency 21        within 24 hours of execution, setting forth the time, 22        date, and location where the warrant was executed and 23        what items, if any, were seized. If the court is not in 24        session, the return information shall be returned on 25        the next date the court is in session. Subject to the 26        provisions of this Section, peace officers shall have   HB4836- 57 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        the same authority to execute a warrant issued 2        pursuant to this subsection as a warrant issued under 3        Article 108 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 4            (ix) Upon discovering a defect in the search 5        warrant, the appropriate law enforcement agency may 6        petition the court to correct the warrant. The law 7        enforcement agency shall take reasonable steps to 8        notify the petitioner before appearing before the 9        court and shall notify the petitioner of any such 10        correction. 11            (x) Upon petition by the appropriate law 12        enforcement agency, the court may modify the search 13        warrant or extend the time to execute the search 14        warrant for a period of no more than 96 hours. In 15        determining whether to modify or extend the warrant, 16        the court shall consider:17                (aa) any increased risk to the petitioner's 18            safety that may result from a modification or 19            extension of the warrant;20                (bb) any unnecessary risk to law enforcement 21            that would be mitigated by a modification or 22            extension of the warrant;23                (cc) any risks to third parties at the 24            location to be searched that would be mitigated by 25            a modification or extension of the warrant; and26                (dd) the likelihood of successful execution of   HB4836- 58 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            warrant.2            The record shall reflect the court's findings in 3        determining whether to extend or modify the warrant. 4        The law enforcement agency shall take reasonable steps 5        to notify the petitioner before appearing before the 6        court and shall notify the petitioner of any 7        modification or extension of the warrant. 8            (xi) Service of any order of protection shall, to 9        the extent possible, be concurrent with the execution 10        of any search warrant under this paragraph. 11            (B) If the respondent is a peace officer as 12        defined in Section 2-13 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 13        the court shall order that any firearms used by the 14        respondent in the performance of his or her duties as a 15        peace officer be surrendered to the chief law 16        enforcement executive of the agency in which the 17        respondent is employed, who shall retain the firearms 18        for safekeeping for the duration of the order of 19        protection.20            (C)(i) Any firearms or firearm parts that could be 21        assembled to make an operable firearm shall be kept by 22        the law enforcement agency that took possession of the 23        items for safekeeping, except as provided in 24        subparagraph (B). The period of safekeeping shall be 25        for the duration of the order of protection. Except as 26        provided in subparagraph (E), the respondent is   HB4836- 59 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        prohibited from transferring firearms or firearm parts 2        to another individual in lieu of surrender to law 3        enforcement. The law enforcement agency shall provide 4        an itemized statement of receipt to the respondent and 5        the court describing any seized or surrendered 6        firearms or firearm parts and informing the respondent 7        that the respondent may seek the return of the 8        respondent's items at the end of the order of 9        protection. The law enforcement agency may enter 10        arrangements, as needed, with federally licensed 11        firearm dealers or other law enforcement agencies for 12        the storage of any firearms seized or surrendered 13        under this subsection.14            (ii) It is the respondent's responsibility to 15        request the return or reinstatement of any Firearm 16        Owner's Identification Card or Concealed Carry License 17        and notify the Illinois State Police Firearm Owner's 18        Identification Card Office at the end of the Order of 19        Protection.20            (iii) At the end of the order of protection, a 21        respondent may request the return of any seized or 22        surrendered firearms or firearm parts that could be 23        assembled to make an operable firearm. Such firearms 24        or firearm parts shall be returned within 14 days of 25        the request to the respondent, if the respondent is 26        lawfully eligible to possess firearms, or to a   HB4836- 60 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        designated third party who is lawfully eligible to 2        possess firearms. If the firearms or firearm parts 3        cannot be returned to respondent because (1) the 4        respondent has not requested the return or transfer of 5        the firearms or firearm parts as set forth in this 6        subparagraph, and (2) the respondent cannot be located 7        or fails to respond to more than 3 requests to retrieve 8        the firearms or firearm parts the court may, or is not 9        lawfully eligible to possess a firearm, upon petition 10        from the appropriate law enforcement agency and notice 11        to the respondent at the respondent's last known 12        address, order the law enforcement agency to destroy 13        the firearms or firearm parts; use the firearms or 14        firearm parts for training purposes or for any other 15        application as deemed appropriate by the law 16        enforcement agency; or turn over the firearm or 17        firearm parts to a third party who is lawfully 18        eligible to possess firearms, and who does not reside 19        with respondent. 20            (D)(i) If a person other than the respondent 21        claims title to any firearms and firearm parts that 22        could be assembled to make an operable firearm seized 23        or surrendered under this subsection, the person may 24        petition the court to have the firearm and firearm 25        parts that could be assembled to make an operable 26        firearm returned to him or her with proper notice to   HB4836- 61 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        the petitioner and respondent. If, at a hearing on the 2        petition, the court determines the person to be the 3        lawful owner of the firearm and firearm parts that 4        could be assembled to make an operable firearm, the 5        firearm and firearm parts that could be assembled to 6        make an operable firearm shall be returned to the 7        person, provided that: 8                (aa) the firearm and firearm parts that could 9            be assembled to make an operable firearm are 10            removed from the respondent's custody, control, or 11            possession and the lawful owner agrees to store 12            the firearm and firearm parts that could be 13            assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner 14            such that the respondent does not have access to 15            or control of the firearm and firearm parts that 16            could be assembled to make an operable firearm; 17            and18                 (bb) the firearm and firearm parts that could 19            be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 20            otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner. 21            (ii) The person petitioning for the return of his 22        or her firearm and firearm parts that could be 23        assembled to make an operable firearm must swear or 24        affirm by affidavit that he or she:25                (aa) is the lawful owner of the firearm and 26            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an   HB4836- 62 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            operable firearm;2                (bb) shall not transfer the firearm and 3            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 4            operable firearm to the respondent; and5                (cc) will store the firearm and firearm parts 6            that could be assembled to make an operable 7            firearm in a manner that the respondent does not 8            have access to or control of the firearm and 9            firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 10            operable firearm. 11            (E)(i) The respondent may file a motion to 12        transfer, at the next scheduled hearing, any seized or 13        surrendered firearms or firearm parts to a third 14        party. Notice of the motion shall be provided to the 15        petitioner and the third party must appear at the 16        hearing. 17            (ii) The court may order transfer of the seized or 18        surrendered firearm or firearm parts only if:19                (aa) the third party transferee affirms by 20            affidavit and to the open court that: 21                    (I) the third party transferee does not 22                reside with the respondent; 23                    (II) the respondent does not have access 24                to the location in which the third party 25                transferee intends to keep the firearms or 26                firearm parts;   HB4836- 63 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1                    (III) the third party transferee will not 2                transfer the firearm or firearm parts to the 3                respondent or anyone who resides with the 4                respondent; 5                    (IV) the third party transferee will 6                maintain control and possession of the firearm 7                or firearm parts until otherwise ordered by 8                the court; and 9                    (V) the third party transferee will be 10                subject to criminal penalties for transferring 11                the firearms or firearm parts to the 12                respondent; and 13                (bb) the court finds that: 14                    (I) the third party respondent holds a 15                valid Firearm Owner's Identification; and16                    (II) the transfer of firearms or firearm 17                parts to the third party transferee does not 18                place the petitioner or any other protected 19                parties at any additional threat or risk of 20                harm. 21        (15) Prohibition of access to records. If an order of 22    protection prohibits respondent from having contact with 23    the minor child, or if petitioner's address is omitted 24    under subsection (b) of Section 203, or if necessary to 25    prevent abuse or wrongful removal or concealment of a 26    minor child, the order shall deny respondent access to,   HB4836- 64 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    and prohibit respondent from inspecting, obtaining, or 2    attempting to inspect or obtain, school or any other 3    records of the minor child who is in the care of 4    petitioner.5        (16) Order for payment of shelter services. Order 6    respondent to reimburse a shelter providing temporary 7    housing and counseling services to the petitioner for the 8    cost of the services, as certified by the shelter and 9    deemed reasonable by the court.10        (17) Order for injunctive relief. Enter injunctive 11    relief necessary or appropriate to prevent further abuse 12    of a family or household member or further abuse, neglect, 13    or exploitation of a high-risk adult with disabilities or 14    to effectuate one of the granted remedies, if supported by 15    the balance of hardships. If the harm to be prevented by 16    the injunction is abuse or any other harm that one of the 17    remedies listed in paragraphs (1) through (16) of this 18    subsection is designed to prevent, no further evidence is 19    necessary that the harm is an irreparable injury.20        (18) Telephone services.21            (A) Unless a condition described in subparagraph 22        (B) of this paragraph exists, the court may, upon 23        request by the petitioner, order a wireless telephone 24        service provider to transfer to the petitioner the 25        right to continue to use a telephone number or numbers 26        indicated by the petitioner and the financial   HB4836- 65 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        responsibility associated with the number or numbers, 2        as set forth in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. 3        For purposes of this paragraph (18), the term 4        "wireless telephone service provider" means a provider 5        of commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 6        332. The petitioner may request the transfer of each 7        telephone number that the petitioner, or a minor child 8        in his or her custody, uses. The clerk of the court 9        shall serve the order on the wireless telephone 10        service provider's agent for service of process 11        provided to the Illinois Commerce Commission. The 12        order shall contain all of the following:13                (i) The name and billing telephone number of 14            the account holder including the name of the 15            wireless telephone service provider that serves 16            the account.17                (ii) Each telephone number that will be 18            transferred.19                (iii) A statement that the provider transfers 20            to the petitioner all financial responsibility for 21            and right to the use of any telephone number 22            transferred under this paragraph.23            (B) A wireless telephone service provider shall 24        terminate the respondent's use of, and shall transfer 25        to the petitioner use of, the telephone number or 26        numbers indicated in subparagraph (A) of this   HB4836- 66 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        paragraph unless it notifies the petitioner, within 72 2        hours after it receives the order, that one of the 3        following applies:4                (i) The account holder named in the order has 5            terminated the account.6                (ii) A difference in network technology would 7            prevent or impair the functionality of a device on 8            a network if the transfer occurs.9                (iii) The transfer would cause a geographic or 10            other limitation on network or service provision 11            to the petitioner.12                (iv) Another technological or operational 13            issue would prevent or impair the use of the 14            telephone number if the transfer occurs.15            (C) The petitioner assumes all financial 16        responsibility for and right to the use of any 17        telephone number transferred under this paragraph. In 18        this paragraph, "financial responsibility" includes 19        monthly service costs and costs associated with any 20        mobile device associated with the number.21            (D) A wireless telephone service provider may 22        apply to the petitioner its routine and customary 23        requirements for establishing an account or 24        transferring a number, including requiring the 25        petitioner to provide proof of identification, 26        financial information, and customer preferences.  HB4836- 67 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1            (E) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a 2        wireless telephone service provider is immune from 3        civil liability for its actions taken in compliance 4        with a court order issued under this paragraph.5            (F) All wireless service providers that provide 6        services to residential customers shall provide to the 7        Illinois Commerce Commission the name and address of 8        an agent for service of orders entered under this 9        paragraph (18). Any change in status of the registered 10        agent must be reported to the Illinois Commerce 11        Commission within 30 days of such change. 12            (G) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall 13        maintain the list of registered agents for service for 14        each wireless telephone service provider on the 15        Commission's website. The Commission may consult with 16        wireless telephone service providers and the Circuit 17        Court Clerks on the manner in which this information 18        is provided and displayed. 19    (c) Relevant factors; findings.20        (1) In determining whether to grant a specific remedy, 21    other than payment of support, the court shall consider 22    relevant factors, including but not limited to the 23    following:24            (i) the nature, frequency, severity, pattern and 25        consequences of the respondent's past abuse, neglect 26        or exploitation of the petitioner or any family or   HB4836- 68 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        household member, including the concealment of his or 2        her location in order to evade service of process or 3        notice, and the likelihood of danger of future abuse, 4        neglect, or exploitation to petitioner or any member 5        of petitioner's or respondent's family or household; 6        and7            (ii) the danger that any minor child will be 8        abused or neglected or improperly relocated from the 9        jurisdiction, improperly concealed within the State or 10        improperly separated from the child's primary 11        caretaker.12        (2) In comparing relative hardships resulting to the 13    parties from loss of possession of the family home, the 14    court shall consider relevant factors, including but not 15    limited to the following:16            (i) availability, accessibility, cost, safety, 17        adequacy, location and other characteristics of 18        alternate housing for each party and any minor child 19        or dependent adult in the party's care;20            (ii) the effect on the party's employment; and21            (iii) the effect on the relationship of the party, 22        and any minor child or dependent adult in the party's 23        care, to family, school, church and community.24        (3) Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 25    (4) of this subsection, the court shall make its findings 26    in an official record or in writing, and shall at a minimum   HB4836- 69 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    set forth the following:2            (i) That the court has considered the applicable 3        relevant factors described in paragraphs (1) and (2) 4        of this subsection.5            (ii) Whether the conduct or actions of respondent, 6        unless prohibited, will likely cause irreparable harm 7        or continued abuse.8            (iii) Whether it is necessary to grant the 9        requested relief in order to protect petitioner or 10        other alleged abused persons.11        (4) For purposes of issuing an ex parte emergency 12    order of protection, the court, as an alternative to or as 13    a supplement to making the findings described in 14    paragraphs (c)(3)(i) through (c)(3)(iii) of this 15    subsection, may use the following procedure:16        When a verified petition for an emergency order of 17    protection in accordance with the requirements of Sections 18    203 and 217 is presented to the court, the court shall 19    examine petitioner on oath or affirmation. An emergency 20    order of protection shall be issued by the court if it 21    appears from the contents of the petition and the 22    examination of petitioner that the averments are 23    sufficient to indicate abuse by respondent and to support 24    the granting of relief under the issuance of the emergency 25    order of protection.26        (5) Never married parties. No rights or   HB4836- 70 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    responsibilities for a minor child born outside of 2    marriage attach to a putative father until a father and 3    child relationship has been established under the Illinois 4    Parentage Act of 1984, the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, 5    the Illinois Public Aid Code, Section 12 of the Vital 6    Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the Probate 7    Act of 1975, the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of 8    Support Act, the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, 9    the Expedited Child Support Act of 1990, any judicial, 10    administrative, or other act of another state or 11    territory, any other Illinois statute, or by any foreign 12    nation establishing the father and child relationship, any 13    other proceeding substantially in conformity with the 14    Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity 15    Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. 104-193), or where 16    both parties appeared in open court or at an 17    administrative hearing acknowledging under oath or 18    admitting by affirmation the existence of a father and 19    child relationship. Absent such an adjudication, finding, 20    or acknowledgment, no putative father shall be granted 21    temporary allocation of parental responsibilities, 22    including parenting time with the minor child, or physical 23    care and possession of the minor child, nor shall an order 24    of payment for support of the minor child be entered.25    (d) Balance of hardships; findings. If the court finds 26that the balance of hardships does not support the granting of   HB4836- 71 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1a remedy governed by paragraph (2), (3), (10), (11), or (16) of 2subsection (b) of this Section, which may require such 3balancing, the court's findings shall so indicate and shall 4include a finding as to whether granting the remedy will 5result in hardship to respondent that would substantially 6outweigh the hardship to petitioner from denial of the remedy. 7The findings shall be an official record or in writing.8    (e) Denial of remedies. Denial of any remedy shall not be 9based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:10        (1) Respondent has cause for any use of force, unless 11    that cause satisfies the standards for justifiable use of 12    force provided by Article 7 of the Criminal Code of 2012;13        (2) Respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;14        (3) Petitioner acted in self-defense or defense of 15    another, provided that, if petitioner utilized force, such 16    force was justifiable under Article 7 of the Criminal Code 17    of 2012; 18        (4) Petitioner did not act in self-defense or defense 19    of another;20        (5) Petitioner left the residence or household to 21    avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation by 22    respondent;23        (6) Petitioner did not leave the residence or 24    household to avoid further abuse, neglect, or exploitation 25    by respondent;26        (7) Conduct by any family or household member excused   HB4836- 72 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    the abuse, neglect, or exploitation by respondent, unless 2    that same conduct would have excused such abuse, neglect, 3    or exploitation if the parties had not been family or 4    household members.5(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1065, eff. 5-11-25.) 6    (750 ILCS 60/223)  (from Ch. 40, par. 2312-23)7    Sec. 223. Enforcement of orders of protection. 8    (a) When violation is crime. A violation of any order of 9protection, whether issued in a civil or criminal proceeding 10or by a military judge, shall be enforced by a criminal court 11when:12        (1) The respondent commits the crime of violation of 13    an order of protection pursuant to Section 12-3.4 or 12-30 14    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 15    by having knowingly violated:16            (i) remedies described in paragraphs (1), (2), 17        (3), (14), or (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 18        of this Act; or19            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 20        the remedies authorized under paragraphs (1), (2), 21        (3), (14), and (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 22        of this Act, in a valid order of protection which is 23        authorized under the laws of another state, tribe, or 24        United States territory; or25            (iii) any other remedy when the act constitutes a   HB4836- 73 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        crime against the protected parties as defined by the 2        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.3        Prosecution for a violation of an order of protection 4    shall not bar concurrent prosecution for any other crime, 5    including any crime that may have been committed at the 6    time of the violation of the order of protection; or7        (1.5) A person commits the crime of violation of an 8    order of protection under Section 12-3.4 or 12-30 of the 9    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 if the 10    person, in violation of an order under subparagraph (D) or 11    (E) of paragraph (14.5) of subsection (b) of Section 214 12    of this Act, knowingly transfers a firearm or firearm 13    parts to the respondent or otherwise allows the respondent 14    access to a firearm or firearm parts. 15        (2) The respondent commits the crime of child 16    abduction pursuant to Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 17    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, by having knowingly 18    violated:19            (i) remedies described in paragraphs (5), (6) or 20        (8) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of this Act; or21            (ii) a remedy, which is substantially similar to 22        the remedies authorized under paragraphs (5), (6), or 23        (8) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of this Act, in a 24        valid order of protection which is authorized under 25        the laws of another state, tribe, or United States 26        territory.  HB4836- 74 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    (b) When violation is contempt of court. A violation of 2any valid Illinois order of protection, whether issued in a 3civil or criminal proceeding or by a military judge, may be 4enforced through civil or criminal contempt procedures, as 5appropriate, by any court with jurisdiction, regardless where 6the act or acts which violated the order of protection were 7committed, to the extent consistent with the venue provisions 8of this Act. Nothing in this Act shall preclude any Illinois 9court from enforcing any valid order of protection issued in 10another state. Illinois courts may enforce orders of 11protection through both criminal prosecution and contempt 12proceedings, unless the action which is second in time is 13barred by collateral estoppel or the constitutional 14prohibition against double jeopardy.15        (1) In a contempt proceeding where the petition for a 16    rule to show cause sets forth facts evidencing an 17    immediate danger that the respondent will flee the 18    jurisdiction, conceal a child, or inflict physical abuse 19    on the petitioner or minor children or on dependent adults 20    in petitioner's care, the court may order the attachment 21    of the respondent without prior service of the rule to 22    show cause or the petition for a rule to show cause. 23    Conditions of release shall be set unless specifically 24    denied in writing.25        (2) A petition for a rule to show cause for violation 26    of an order of protection shall be treated as an expedited   HB4836- 75 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1    proceeding.2    (b-1) The court shall not hold a school district or 3private or non-public school or any of its employees in civil 4or criminal contempt unless the school district or private or 5non-public school has been allowed to intervene.6    (b-2) The court may hold the parents, guardian, or legal 7custodian of a minor respondent in civil or criminal contempt 8for a violation of any provision of any order entered under 9this Act for conduct of the minor respondent in violation of 10this Act if the parents, guardian, or legal custodian 11directed, encouraged, or assisted the respondent minor in such 12conduct. 13    (c) Violation of custody or support orders or temporary or 14final judgments allocating parental responsibilities. A 15violation of remedies described in paragraphs (5), (6), (8), 16or (9) of subsection (b) of Section 214 of this Act may be 17enforced by any remedy provided by Section 607.5 of the 18Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act. The court 19may enforce any order for support issued under paragraph (12) 20of subsection (b) of Section 214 in the manner provided for 21under Parts V and VII of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution 22of Marriage Act.23    (d) Actual knowledge. An order of protection may be 24enforced pursuant to this Section if the respondent violates 25the order after the respondent has actual knowledge of its 26contents as shown through one of the following means:  HB4836- 76 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        (1) By service, delivery, or notice under Section 210.2        (2) By notice under Section 210.1 or 211.3        (3) By service of an order of protection under Section 4    222.5        (4) By other means demonstrating actual knowledge of 6    the contents of the order.7    (e) The enforcement of an order of protection in civil or 8criminal court shall not be affected by either of the 9following:10        (1) The existence of a separate, correlative order, 11    entered under Section 215.12        (2) Any finding or order entered in a conjoined 13    criminal proceeding.14    (f) Circumstances. The court, when determining whether or 15not a violation of an order of protection has occurred, shall 16not require physical manifestations of abuse on the person of 17the victim.18    (g) Penalties.19        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 20    subsection, where the court finds the commission of a 21    crime or contempt of court under subsections (a) or (b) of 22    this Section, the penalty shall be the penalty that 23    generally applies in such criminal or contempt 24    proceedings, and may include one or more of the following: 25    incarceration, payment of restitution, a fine, payment of 26    attorneys' fees and costs, or community service.  HB4836- 77 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        (2) The court shall hear and take into account 2    evidence of any factors in aggravation or mitigation 3    before deciding an appropriate penalty under paragraph (1) 4    of this subsection.5        (3) To the extent permitted by law, the court is 6    encouraged to:7            (i) increase the penalty for the knowing violation 8        of any order of protection over any penalty previously 9        imposed by any court for respondent's violation of any 10        order of protection or penal statute involving 11        petitioner as victim and respondent as defendant;12            (ii) impose a minimum penalty of 24 hours 13        imprisonment for respondent's first violation of any 14        order of protection; and15            (iii) impose a minimum penalty of 48 hours 16        imprisonment for respondent's second or subsequent 17        violation of an order of protection18    unless the court explicitly finds that an increased 19    penalty or that period of imprisonment would be manifestly 20    unjust.21        (4) In addition to any other penalties imposed for a 22    violation of an order of protection, a criminal court may 23    consider evidence of any violations of an order of 24    protection:25            (i) to increase, revoke or modify the conditions 26        of pretrial release on an underlying criminal charge   HB4836- 78 -LRB104 17416 RLC 30841 b1        pursuant to Section 110-6 of the Code of Criminal 2        Procedure of 1963;3            (ii) to revoke or modify an order of probation, 4        conditional discharge or supervision, pursuant to 5        Section 5-6-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;6            (iii) to revoke or modify a sentence of periodic 7        imprisonment, pursuant to Section 5-7-2 of the Unified 8        Code of Corrections.9        (5) In addition to any other penalties, the court 10    shall impose an additional fine of $20 as authorized by 11    Section 5-9-1.11 of the Unified Code of Corrections upon 12    any person convicted of or placed on supervision for a 13    violation of an order of protection. The additional fine 14    shall be imposed for each violation of this Section.15(Source: P.A. 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 103-407, eff. 7-28-23.)